Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.080

Federal funds for school plant facilities—Rules.

Insofar as is permissible under acts of congress, funds made available by the federal government for the purpose of assisting school districts in providing school plant facilities shall be made available to such districts in conformity with rules that the superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall establish.

[ 2006 c 263 s 306; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.120. Prior: 1947 c 278 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4940-19. Formerly RCW 28A.47.120, 28.47.120.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.